Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 8 Directors and Officers

7-1.2-801.
Board of directors.

Except as may be otherwise provided in this chapter or in the articles of incorporation, the business and affairs of a corporation are managed by a board of directors. Directors need not be residents of this state or shareholders of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require it. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors. The board of directors has authority to fix the compensation of directors unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation.

A director shall discharge his duties as a director, including his duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

With the care that a person in a like position would reasonably believe appropriate under similar circumstances; and

In a manner he or she reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging his or her duties, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of directors of which he or she is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

A director is not acting in good faith if he or she has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (c) unwarranted.

A director is not liable for any action taken as a director, or any failure to take any action, if he or she performed the duties of his or her office in compliance with this section.

For the purposes of subsections (b) through (e), “corporation” also includes any financial institution, insurance company, public utility or other quasi-public corporation having purposes enumerated as exceptions to this chapter in §

7-1.2-301

and the provisions of subsections (b) through (e) of this section are applicable to the directors of that corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-802.
Number and election of directors.

The board of directors of a corporation consists of one or more members. The number of directors is fixed by, or in the manner provided in, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment to, or in the manner provided in, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, but no decrease has the effect of shortening the term of any incumbent director. If the articles of incorporation provide for the election of directors in the manner specified in subsection (d) of §

7-1.2-708

, the number of directors may not be decreased unless approved by the shareholders with less than the number of shares previously entitled to elect one director voting against the decrease. Initial directors hold office until the first annual meeting of shareholders, and until their successors have been elected and qualified. At the first annual meeting of shareholders and at each subsequent annual meeting, the shareholders shall elect directors to hold office until the next succeeding annual meeting, except in the case of the classification of directors as permitted by this chapter. Each director holds office for the term for which he or she is elected and until his or her successor has been elected and qualified. Any director may resign at any time upon notice given in writing to the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 36; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 36; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-803.
Classification of directors.

When the board of directors consists of nine (9) or more members, in lieu of electing the whole number of directors annually, the articles of incorporation may provide that the directors be divided into either two (2) or three (3) classes, each class to be as nearly equal in number as possible, the term of office of directors of the first class to expire at the first annual meeting of shareholders after their election, that of the second class to expire at the second annual meeting after their election, and that of the third class, if any, to expire at the third annual meeting after their election. At each annual meeting after the classification, the number of directors equal to the number of the class whose term expires at the time of the meeting will be elected to hold office until the second succeeding annual meeting, if there are two (2) classes, or until the third succeeding annual meeting, if there are three (3) classes. No classification of directors is effective prior to the first annual meeting of shareholders. The articles of incorporation may confer upon holders of any class or series of shares the right to elect one or more directors who serve for any term and have any voting powers stated in the articles of incorporation. The terms of office and voting powers of the directors elected in the manner provided in the articles of incorporation may be greater than or less than those of any other director or class of directors.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-804.
Vacancies.

Any vacancy occurring in the board of directors may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors though less than a quorum of the board of directors. A director elected to fill a vacancy is elected for the unexpired term of his or her predecessor in office. Any directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors may be filled by the board of directors for a term of office continuing only until the next election of directors by the shareholders. If at any time, by reason of death, resignation or other cause, a corporation should have no directors in office, then any officer or any shareholder or an executor, administrator, trustee or guardian of a shareholder, or other fiduciary entrusted with like responsibility for the person or estate of a shareholder, may call a special meeting of shareholders in accordance with the provisions of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, or may apply to the superior court for a decree summarily ordering a meeting for the purposes of conducting an election.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-805.
Removal of directors.

Any or all of the directors may be removed for cause by vote of the shareholders. The articles of incorporation or the specific provisions of a bylaw adopted by the shareholders may provide for the removal by action of the board, except in the case of any director elected by cumulative voting, or by the holders of the shares of any class or series, or holders of bonds, voting as a class, when entitled by the provisions of the articles of incorporation.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause, any or all of the directors may be removed without cause by vote of the shareholders.

The removal of directors, with or without cause, as provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section is subject to the following:

In the case of a corporation having cumulative voting, no director may be removed when the votes cast against his or her removal would be sufficient to elect him or her if voted cumulatively at an election at which the same total number of votes were cast and the entire board, or the entire class of directors of which he or she is a member, were then being elected; and

When by the provisions of the articles of incorporation the holders of the shares of any class or series, or holders of bonds, voting as a class, are entitled to elect one or more directors, any director so elected may be removed only by the applicable vote of the holders of the shares of that class or series or the holders of the bonds, voting as a class.

An action to procure a judgment removing a director for cause may be brought by the attorney general or by the holders of ten percent (10%) of the outstanding shares, whether or not entitled to vote. The court having jurisdiction may bar from reelection any directors so removed for a period fixed by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-806.
Quorum of directors.

A majority of the number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, or by the shareholders or in the absence of a bylaw or shareholder action fixing the number of directors, then of the number stated in the articles of incorporation, constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business unless a greater number is required by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. The act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present is the act of the board of directors, unless the act of a greater number is required by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-807.
Director and officer conflicts of interest.

No contract or transaction between a corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between a corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers or have a financial interest, is void or voidable nor are the directors or officers liable with respect to the contract or transaction solely for this reason, or solely because the director or officer is present at, or participates in, the meeting of the board or committee of the board which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because his or her or their votes are counted for that purpose, if:

The material facts as to his or her or their interest or relationship are disclosed or are known to the board of directors or the committee, and the board of directors or committee authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction by the affirmative votes of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors are less than a quorum; or

The material facts as to his or her or their interest or relationship are disclosed or are known to the shareholders entitled to vote on the contract or transaction, and the contract or transaction is specifically authorized, approved, or ratified by vote of the shareholders; or

The contract or transaction is fair and reasonable as to the corporation.

Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the board of directors or of a committee which authorizes the contract or transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-808.
Executive and other committees.

Unless otherwise restricted or limited by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, the board of directors, by resolution adopted by a majority of the full board of directors, may designate from among its members an executive committee and one or more other committees each of which, to the extent provided in the resolution or in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of the corporation, have and may exercise all the authority of the board of directors, but no committee has the authority of the board of directors in reference to amending the articles of incorporation, adopting a plan of merger, recommending to the shareholders the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all the property and assets of the corporation other than in the usual and regular course of its business, recommending to the shareholders a voluntary dissolution or revocation of the corporation, or amending the bylaws of the corporation. The designation of any committee and the delegation to the committee of authority does not operate to relieve the board of directors, or any member of the board, of any responsibility imposed by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-809.
Place, notice, and form of notice of directors’ and committee meetings.

Meetings of the board of directors, or any committee designated by the board, regular or special, may be held either within or without this state.

Regular meetings of the board of directors or any committee designated by the board may be held with or without notice as prescribed in the bylaws. Unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide for an alternative period, special meetings of the board of directors or any committee designated by the board must be preceded by at least two (2) days’ notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting. Attendance of a director at a meeting constitutes a waiver of notice of the meeting, except where a director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the board of directors or any committee designated by the board of directors need be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of the meeting unless required by the bylaws. Except as may be otherwise restricted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, members of the board of directors, or any committee designated by the board of directors, may participate in a meeting of the board or committee by means of a conference telephone or similar communications equipment, by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time and participation by those means constitutes presence in person at a meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-810.
Action by directors without a meeting.

Unless otherwise provided by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, any action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of the directors of a corporation, or any action which may be taken at a meeting of the directors or of a committee, may be taken without a meeting if all of the directors, or all of the members of the committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing or by electronic transmission, before or after the action, and the writing or writings or electronic transmission or transmissions are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the board or committee. The consent has the same effect as a unanimous vote for all purposes, and that may be stated in any certificate or other document filed with the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-811.
Liability of directors in certain cases.

In addition to any other liabilities imposed by law upon directors of a corporation:

Directors of a corporation who vote for or assent to the declaration of any dividend or other distribution of the assets of a corporation to its shareholders contrary to the provisions of this chapter or contrary to any restrictions contained in the articles of incorporation, are jointly and severally liable to the corporation for the amount of the dividend which is paid or the value of the assets which are distributed in excess of the amount of the dividend or distribution which could have been paid or distributed without a violation of the provisions of this chapter or the restrictions in the articles of incorporation.

Directors of a corporation who vote for or assent to the purchase of its own shares contrary to the provisions of this chapter are jointly and severally liable to the corporation for the amount of consideration paid for the shares which is in excess of the maximum amount which could have been paid for the shares without a violation of the provisions of this chapter.

Directors of a corporation who vote for or assent to any distribution of assets of a corporation to its shareholders during the liquidation of the corporation without the payment and discharge of, or making adequate provision for, all known debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation are jointly and severally liable to the corporation for the value of the assets which are distributed, to the extent that the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation are not subsequently paid and discharged.

A director who is present at a meeting of its board of directors at which action on any corporate matter is taken is presumed to have assented to the action taken unless his or her dissent is entered in the minutes of the meeting or unless he or she files his or her written dissent to the action with the person acting as the secretary of the meeting before the meeting’s adjournment or forwards the dissent by registered mail to the secretary of the corporation immediately after the adjournment of the meeting. The right to dissent does not apply to a director who voted in favor of the action.

A director is not liable under this section if under the circumstances he or she acted with due care and in good faith, and without limiting the generality of what has just been stated, is not liable if he or she relied in good faith upon financial statements of the corporation represented to him or her to be correct and to be based upon generally accepted accounting principles by the president or the officer of the corporation having charge of its books of account, or stated in a written report by an independent public or certified public accountant or firm of accountants fairly to reflect the financial condition of the corporation.

Any director against whom a claim is asserted under or pursuant to this section for the payment of a dividend or other distribution of assets of a corporation and who is held liable on the claim, is entitled to contribution from the shareholders who accepted or received any dividend or assets, knowing the dividend or distribution to have been made in violation of this chapter, in proportion to the amounts received by them respectively.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-812.
Officers.

The officers of a corporation consist of a president, a secretary, and a treasurer, and such other officers as are authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors each of whom is elected by the board of directors or by the shareholders at a time and in a manner as prescribed by the bylaws. Any other officers and assistant officers and agents that are necessary may be elected or appointed by the board of directors or by the shareholders or chosen in another manner prescribed by the bylaws. Any two (2) or more offices may be held by the same person. A failure to elect officers does not dissolve or otherwise affect the corporation.

All officers of the corporation, as between themselves and the corporation, have the authority and perform any duties in the management of the corporation that may be provided in the bylaws, or that may be determined by resolution of the board of directors, subject to any limitations on the authority contained in the bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-813.
Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. Any officer may be removed at any time with or without cause by the board of directors or by any other manner permitted by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. Election, appointment or removal of an officer or agent does not of itself create contract rights.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-814.
Indemnification.

Definitions. As used in this section:

“Director” or “officer” means any individual who is or was a director or officer of the corporation and any individual who, while a director or officer of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, limited-liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust, other enterprise, employee benefit plan, or other entity. A director or officer is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the corporation’s request if his or her duties to the corporation also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, him or her to the plan or participants on or beneficiaries of the plan. “Director” or “officer” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of the director or officer.

“Corporation” includes:

Any domestic or foreign corporation, profit or nonprofit;

Any domestic or foreign predecessor entity of the corporation in a merger or other transaction in which the predecessor’s existence ceased upon consummation of the transaction; and

Any of the classes of quasi public corporations with purposes enumerated as exceptions in §

7-1.2-301

to the extent that the corporations are not subject to other provisions of the general laws or special acts authorizing indemnification of their directors and officers.

“Expenses” include attorneys’ fees.

“Liability” means the obligation to pay a judgment, penalties, fines (including an excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan), settlements, or reasonable expenses actually incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding.

“Official capacity” means:

When used with respect to a director, the office of director in the corporation; and

When used with respect to an officer, as contemplated in subsection (i), the office in a corporation held by the officer. “Official capacity” does not include service for an individual other than a director, as contemplated in subsection (a)(1), the elective or appointive office in the corporation held by the officer or the employment or agency relationship undertaken by the employee or agent on behalf of the corporation, but in each case does not include service for any other foreign or domestic corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust, other enterprise, or employee benefit plan.

“Party” includes an individual who was, is, or is threatened to be made, a named defendant or respondent in a proceeding.

“Proceeding” means any threatened, pending or completed action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative.

Permissible indemnification.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a corporation has power to indemnify any individual made a party to any proceeding by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director if:

He or she conducted himself or herself in good faith; and

He or she reasonably believed:

In the case of conduct in his or her official capacity with the corporation, that his or her conduct was in its best interests; and

In all other cases, that his or her conduct was at least not opposed to the corporation’s best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, he or she had no reasonable cause to believe his or her conduct was unlawful; or

He or she engaged in conduct for which broader indemnification has been made permissible or obligatory under a provision of the articles of incorporation.

A director’s conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose he or she reasonably believed to be in the interests of the participants and beneficiaries of the plan is deemed to be for a purpose which is not opposed to the best interests of the corporation in accordance with (b)(1)(ii)(B).

The termination of any proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent, is not, of itself, determinative that the individual did not meet the requisite standard of conduct set forth in this subsection.

Unless ordered by a court under subsection (d) of this section, a corporation may not indemnify a director:

In connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, except for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding (if it is determined that the director has met the relevant standard of conduct under (b)(1)(i) and (ii)); or

In connection with any proceeding for which the director was adjudged liable to the corporation on the basis that he or she received an improper personal benefit, whether or not involving action in his or her official capacity.

Mandatory indemnification. Unless limited by the articles of incorporation, a director who has been wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding referred to in subsection (b) of this section is indemnified against reasonable expenses incurred by him or her in connection with the proceeding.

Court-ordered indemnification.

A court of appropriate jurisdiction, upon application of a director and any notice that the court requires, has authority to order indemnification in the following circumstances:

If the court determines a director is entitled to reimbursement under subsection (c) of this section, the court shall order indemnification, in which case the director is also entitled to recover the expenses of securing the reimbursement; or

If the court determines that the director is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether or not he or she has met the standard of conduct set forth in subsection (b)(1) or (b)(2) or has been adjudged liable in the circumstances described in subsection (b)(4)(ii), the court may order such indemnification as the court shall deem proper, except that indemnification with respect to any proceeding by or in the right of the corporation or in which liability has been adjudged in the circumstances described in subsection (b)(4)(i) is limited to expenses.

A court of appropriate jurisdiction may be the same court in which the proceeding involving the director’s liability took place.

Advance for expenses. Reasonable expenses incurred by a director who is a party to a proceeding may be paid or reimbursed by the corporation in advance of the final disposition of the proceeding upon receipt by the corporation of:

A written affirmation by the director of his or her good faith belief that he or she has met the standard of conduct necessary for indemnification by the corporation as authorized in this section; and

A written undertaking by or on behalf of the director to repay the amount if the court determines that he or she has not met that standard of conduct, and after a determination that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this section. The undertaking required by this subdivision must be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment. Determinations and authorizations of payments under this subsection are made in the manner specified in subsection (f).

Determination and authorization of indemnification.

No indemnification under subsection (b) may be made by the corporation unless authorized in the specific case after a determination has been made that indemnification of the director is permissible in the circumstances because he or she has met the standard of conduct set forth in subsection (b). The determination must be made:

By the board of directors by a majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors not at the time parties to the proceeding; or

If such a quorum cannot be obtained, then by a majority vote of a committee of the board, duly designated to act in the matter by a majority vote of the full board (in which designation directors who are parties may participate), consisting solely of two (2) or more directors not at the time parties to the proceeding; or

By special legal counsel, selected by the board of directors or a committee of the board by vote as set forth in subsection (f)(1)(i) or (f)(1)(ii), or, if the requisite quorum of the full board cannot be obtained for the vote and the committee cannot be established, by a majority vote of the full board (in which selection directors who are parties may participate); or

By the shareholders.

Authorization of indemnification and determination as to reasonableness of expenses are made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification is permissible, except that if the determination that indemnification is permissible is made by special legal counsel, authorization of indemnification and determination as to reasonableness of expenses must be made in a manner specified in subsection (f)(1)(iii) for the selection of the counsel. Shares held by directors who are parties to the proceeding may not be voted on the subject matter under this subsection.

Variation by corporate action. The indemnification provided by this section is not deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification are entitled under any bylaw, agreement, vote of shareholders or disinterested directors or otherwise, both as to action in his or her official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding office, and continues as to an individual who has ceased to be a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent and inures to the benefit of the heirs, executors, and administrators of an individual. Nothing contained in this section limits the corporation’s power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director in connection with his or her appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when he or she has not been made a named defendant or respondent in the proceeding.

Officers. Unless limited by the articles of incorporation:

An officer of the corporation is indemnified under this section as and to the same extent provided for a director, and is entitled to the same extent as a director to seek indemnification pursuant to the provisions of this section;

A corporation has the power to indemnify and to advance expenses to an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation to the same extent that it may indemnify and advance expenses to directors pursuant to this section; and

A corporation, in addition, has the power to indemnify and to advance expenses to an officer, employee, or agent who is not a director to a further extent, consistent with law, that is provided by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors, or contract.

Insurance. A corporation has the power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any individual who is or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, or who, while a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, other enterprise, or employee benefit plan, against any liability asserted against him or her and incurred by him or her in any corporate capacity or arising out of his or her status as a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, whether or not the corporation would have the power to indemnify him or her against the liability under the provisions of this section.

Shareholder approval. Any indemnification of, or advance of expenses to, a director in accordance with this section, if arising out of a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, must be reported, in writing, to the shareholders with or before the notice of the next shareholders’ meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 107, § 1.